California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(1) Construction costs for berthing facilities, dredging, parking, public access facilities, restrooms, vessel pumpout facilities, oil recycling facilities, utilities, landscaping, receptacles for the purpose of separating, reusing, or recycling all solid waste materials, and other incidental boating-related amenities.

(2) Acquisition, collateral appraisals, permit fees, planning, engineering, and design expenses directly related to the items specified in paragraph (1).

(b) The department shall not make a loan to a recreational marina that restricts access or bars the public other than that which is consistent with general commercial business practices.

(c) Any private marina owner who purchases facilities previously developed with a department loan is eligible to apply for a new construction loan from the department.

(d) (1) The department may also make a loan to a recreational marina for the purpose of refinancing an existing loan, subject to the following conditions:

(A) Not more than 70 percent of the proceeds from the loan shall be used to refinance an existing loan.

(B) Not less than 30 percent of the loan proceeds shall be used
 for construction activity authorized under this section.

(C) The loan applicant shall meet all other requirements under law for loan qualification and any other applicable term or condition of law.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit a person from applying for a loan under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 11.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

76.4.

(a) An application for a loan under Section 76.3 shall be filed with the department and shall:

(1) Include a feasibility study containing sufficient information and detail to demonstrate that the project is engineeringly and financially feasible.

(2) Be processed with due diligence, giving consideration to the needs of the borrower and the interest of the public in preserving the integrity of the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(3) Include evidence of compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). 

(4) Include all costs incurred by the applicant in processing and obtaining loan proceeds.

(b) The costs of brokerage fees, planning studies, and all other costs for the preparation of the loan application shall be borne by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1307, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76.5.

In processing applications under this article, the division shall give priority to applications from qualified private marina owners who have not received previous loans from the department. If the department finds a proposed loan project is feasible, the loan request shall be submitted to the commission for its advice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 114.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

76.6.

Loans made under this article shall include, but are not limited to, the following terms and conditions:

(a) The minimum annual rate of interest charged by the division for a loan shall be set annually by the division and shall be a rate equal to 1 percent per annum plus the prime or base rate of interest.

(b) The division shall require collateral in a minimum amount of 110 percent of the loan.

(c) The repayment period of a loan shall not exceed 20 years, or be longer than the length of the borrower’s leasehold estate, including renewal options, if the loan is based upon a leasehold estate of the borrower.

(d) All loans shall amortize the principal over the term of the loan. However, a loan shall become due and payable in full if the borrower sells or otherwise transfers the recreational marina developed with divisional funds, unless the transfer is, by reason of the death of the borrower, to the borrower’s heirs.

(e) The division’s loans shall not be subordinated to any future loans obtained by a private marina owner, except in those cases involving loans acquired for refinancing previous senior loans.

(f) The division may allow assumption of loans from the original borrower by future parties, subject to completion of the application process and upon approval by the division.

(g) The division may, upon written request by the borrower, restate an existing
 loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 115.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

76.7.

(a) All loans made by the department to private marina owners shall be funded from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(b) All loans, including those loans previously made under Section 35300 of the Financial Code, shall be repaid by private marina owners to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(c) Private marina owners receiving loans made by the department shall not charge unreasonably high boat berthing fees.

(d) The department shall monitor the berthing fees of the private marina owners receiving department loans to ensure that these rates are reasonable and not exorbitant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1428, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

76.8.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement or make this article more specific, including standards for the approval of loans, which shall include, but not be limited to, definitions of collateral, standards for the payment of loans, weighing and ranking criteria to qualify and prioritize the loans, and the form of documents to be used to evidence loans. The purpose of the regulations shall be to ensure that loans made under this article conform with customary commercial practices. No loans shall be made pursuant to this article from funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 1999 until the loan approval standards have been approved by the Department of Finance. Any subsequent changes to the loan approval standards shall also be approved by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 66, Sec. 3.   Effective July 6, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

77.

(a) The department, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, may borrow funds from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund when a borrower has defaulted from any financial obligation and funds are required to protect the security interest of the department with respect to any loan made under Section 76.3.

(b) The funds borrowed under this section shall be repaid within three years from the date of the approval of the Director of Finance. The repayment shall include the principal amount of the loan, plus interest equal to the rate of earnings of money deposited in the Surplus Money Investment Fund at the time the loan is approved by the Director of Finance.

(c) A maximum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) per year may be used for purposes of this section.

(d) The borrowed funds may be used to do any of the following:

(1) Pay any administrative and legal expenses incurred in connection with those defaults.

(2) Acquire through negotiated purchase or bid at auction any property which serves as collateral for those defaulted loans.

(3) Pay any costs of operating and maintaining a recreational marina acquired as a result of a failed loan, until the marina is sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1500, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

77.1.

The department, upon whatever terms and conditions it deems proper, may sell or otherwise dispose of property serving as collateral for a defaulted loan made under Section 76.3 or may operate, contract to operate, or let property involved in the default. All proceeds from any action of the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund and credited towards the repayment of the defaulted loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1500, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Boating and Waterways Commission [80. - 82.6.]

80.

(a) The Harbors and Watercraft Commission and its successor, the Navigation and Ocean Development Commission, are continued in existence in the Department of Parks and Recreation and within the Division of Boating and Waterways as the Boating and Waterways Commission, but with only the powers and duties imposed upon it by this chapter.

(b) The Legislature finds all of the following:

(1) Recreational boating and recreational watercraft use continue to be popular activities enjoyed by Californians and others visiting the state.

(2) Harbors, docks, waterways, piers, and other similar water bodies or infrastructure governed by this chapter should remain open to all members of the public equally.

(3) Absent deliberate and thoughtful planning and regulation, those activities have the potential to be dangerous or deadly, difficult, and expensive for the general public to access and enjoy, and environmentally unsound.

(c) The Legislature hereby declares that effectively managed waterways and adequate facilities for the use of boating and watercraft vessels are essential for safe, accessible, and ecologically balanced boating and waterway
 recreation throughout the state.

(d) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) Existing boating and watercraft recreational areas, facilities, and opportunities should be expanded and managed in a manner consistent with this chapter, in particular, to maintain safe, publicly accessible, and sustained long-term use.

(2) New recreational boating and watercraft facilities, including harbors, docks, and piers, should be provided and managed pursuant to this chapter in a manner that will sustain long-term use by the public.

(3) Waterways, harbors, ports, piers, and other boating or watercraft infrastructure should be maintained to ensure sustainable long-term public utility.

(4) Boating and watercraft recreation should be managed in accordance with this chapter through financial assistance to local governments and joint undertakings with agencies of the United States and with federally recognized Native American tribes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

80.2.

The commission shall be composed of seven members appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. The members shall have experience and background consistent with the functions of the commission. In making appointments to the commission, the Governor shall give primary consideration to geographical location of the residence of members as related to boating activities and harbors. In addition to the geographical considerations, the members of the commission shall be appointed with regard to their special interests in recreational boating. At least one of the members shall be a member of a recognized statewide organization representing recreational boaters. One member of the commission shall be a private small craft harbor owner and operator. One member of the commission shall be an officer or employee of a law enforcement agency
 responsible for enforcing boating laws.

The Governor shall appoint the first seven members of the commission for the following terms to expire on January 15: one member for one year, two members for two years, two members for three years, and two members for four years. Thereafter, appointments shall be for a four-year term. Vacancies occurring prior to the expiration of the term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 104.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

80.6.

Members of the commission may receive a salary for their services in an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day, up to a maximum of 14 days per year. A member of the commission may also be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses which are incurred in the performance of the member’s duties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

80.8.

The members of the commission may be removed from office by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, misuse of office, or misfeasance in office, in the manner provided by law for the removal of other public officers for like causes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

81.

The commission shall, immediately after the effective date of this section, organize and elect from its members a chairman and a vice chairman who shall serve for one year or until their successors are elected and qualified. Annually thereafter, the commission shall elect a chairman and a vice chairman.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

81.2.

The commission shall adopt a seal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

81.4.

No action shall be taken by the commission by less than a majority of its members.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

81.6.

The Department of General Services shall furnish suitable offices and equipment for the use of the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

81.8.

The deputy director shall act as the secretary of the commission.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 328.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

82.

The division, consistent with Section 82.3, and in furtherance of the public interest and in accordance therewith, shall have only the following duties with respect to the commission:

(a) To submit any proposed changes in regulations pertaining to boating functions and responsibilities of the division to the commission for its advice and comment prior to enactment of changes.

(b) To submit proposals for transfers pursuant to Section 70, loans pursuant to Section 71.4 or 76.3, and grants pursuant to Section 72.5 to the commission for its advice and comment.

(c) To submit any proposed project for which it is making a
 determination of eligibility for funding from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund to the commission if that project could have a potentially significant impact on either public health or safety, public access, or the environment for the commission’s advice and comment prior to making that determination.

(d) To annually submit a report on its budget and expenditures to the commission for its advice and comment.

(e) To cause studies and surveys to be made of the need for small craft harbors and connecting waterways throughout the state and the most suitable sites therefore, and submit those studies and surveys to the commission for advice and comment.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 116.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

82.3.

The commission shall have the following particular duties and responsibilities:

(a) To be fully informed regarding all governmental activities affecting programs administered by the division.

(b) To meet at least four times per year at various locations throughout the state to receive comments on the implementation of the programs administered by the division and establish an annual calendar of proposed meetings at the beginning of each calendar year. The meetings shall include a public meeting, before the beginning of each funding cycle of a loan and grant program funded from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, to collect public input concerning the program, recommendations
 for program improvements, and specific project needs for the system.

(c) To hold a public hearing to receive public comment regarding any proposed project subject to subdivision (c) of Section 82 at a location in close geographic proximity to the proposed project, unless a hearing consistent with federal law or regulation has already been held regarding the project.

(d) To consider, upon the request of any owner or tenant whose property is in the vicinity of any proposed project subject to subdivision (c) of Section 82, any alleged adverse impacts occurring on that person’s property from activities undertaken pursuant to this code, and recommend to the division suitable measures for the prevention of any adverse impacts determined by the commission to be occurring, and suitable measures for the restoration of adversely impacted property.

(e) To review and comment annually to the division on the proposed budget of expenditures from the revolving fund.

(f) To review all proposals for local and regional waterways, piers, harbors, docks, or other recreational areas that have applied for grant or loan funds from the division prior to a final determination of eligibility by the division.

(g) (1) With support and assistance from the division, to prepare and submit a program report to the Governor, the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks and Wildlife, the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the Assembly Committee on Appropriations on or before January 1, 2013, and every three years thereafter. The report shall be adopted by the commission after discussing the contents during two or more
 public meetings. The report shall address the status of any regulations adopted or being considered by the division and any loan or grant that has been or is being considered for a determination of eligibility by the division pending the previous report.

(2) A report required to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 117.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

82.4.

All meetings of the commission shall be open and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meetings of the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

82.6.

All records of the commission shall be open to inspection by the public during regular office hours.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund [85. - 88.]

85.

All moneys received by the department, including any moneys received by the department from the purchase or condemnation by any other person or agency of any property acquired by the department for the purposes of this division, shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, which fund is hereby created. The Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund is the successor to the Small Craft Harbor Revolving Fund, which fund is hereby abolished. All references in any law to the Small Craft Harbor Revolving Fund shall be deemed to refer to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

85.2.

(a) All moneys in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the Department of Parks and Recreation for boating facilities development, boating safety, and boating regulation programs, and for the purposes of Section 656.4, including refunds, and for expenditure for construction of small craft harbor and boating facilities planned, designed, and constructed by the division, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 50, at sites owned or under the control of the state.

(b) (1) The money in the fund is also available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the operation and maintenance of units of the state park system that have boating-related activities. Funds
 appropriated may also be used for boating safety and enforcement programs.

(2) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall submit to the Legislature, on or before January 1 of each year, a report describing the allocation and expenditure of funds made available to the Department of Parks and Recreation from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund and from that portion of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, transferred annually pursuant to Item 3790-012-0061 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act, attributable to taxes imposed on the distribution of motor vehicle fuel used or usable in propelling vessels during the
 previous fiscal year. The report shall list the special project or use, project location, amount of money allocated or expended, the source of funds allocated or expended, and the relation of the project or use to boating activities.

(c) The money in the fund shall also be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Water Resources Control Board for boating-related water quality regulatory activities.

(d) The money in the fund is also available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for activities addressing the boating-related spread of invasive species.

(e) The
 money in the fund is also available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Food and Agriculture for activities addressing the boating-related spread of invasive species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 67.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

86.

(a) The local public agency shall annually certify to the department that for a small craft harbor or boating facility project that is, or has been, funded pursuant to Section 70, 70.2, 70.8, 71.4, 72.5, or 76.3, or a harbor constructed with funds from the State Lands Commission from tidelands oil revenues, adequate restroom and sanitary facilities, parking, refuse disposal, vessel pumpout facilities as required pursuant to Section 776, walkways, oil recycling facilities, receptacles for the purpose of separating, reusing, or recycling all solid waste materials, and other necessary shoreside facilities sufficient for the use and operation of all vessels using the harbor or facility are provided or provide written findings showing why the facility cannot certify to these conditions.

(b) A city, county, or district, which has received or is receiving moneys under this division for the construction or improvement of small craft harbors that provides facilities for the operation of commercial fishing vessels registered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7880) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code, shall not prohibit the commercial operation and use of those facilities by commercial passenger fishing vessels of the same or similar displacement, which are licensed pursuant to Section 7920 of the Fish and Game Code, or the use by private recreational vessels unless otherwise expressly provided by law, unless the city, county, or district provides, elsewhere in the same harbor, alternative, equivalent facilities available at comparable cost for the commercial operation and use of commercial passenger fishing vessels and private recreational vessels or unless the city, county, or district adopts
 written findings showing why the existing facility cannot accommodate the operation of commercial fishing vessels, including commercial passenger fishing vessels, or private recreational vessels and why the facility cannot be modified to do so or why alternative, equivalent facilities cannot be provided in the same harbor to accommodate those operations. This subdivision does not require a facility to accept an application for the operation of an additional commercial passenger fishing boat at that facility if the harbor provides alternative, equivalent, adequate, safe facilities at comparable cost for the operation and use of commercial passenger fishing boats or if accommodations for the operation of the additional commercial passenger fishing boat are not reasonably available at the facility under the contract or agreement.

For the purposes of this subdivision, an alternative, equivalent facility in the same harbor shall provide, at comparable cost, adequate
 restroom and sanitary facilities, parking, refuse disposal, vessel pumpout facilities, walkways, oil recycling facilities, receptacles for the purpose of separating, reusing, or recycling all solid waste materials, power and water service, and other shoreside facilities and equivalent docks, water channels, navigation aids, and weather protection, including, but not limited to, breakwaters, which are equivalent to the facility funded pursuant to Section 70, 70.2, 70.8, 71.4, 72.5, or 76.3.

(c) (1) A loan, grant, contract or agreement, or plan funded pursuant to Section 70, 70.2, 70.8, 71.4, 72.5, or 76.3 for a small craft harbor or boating facility project shall provide for construction, development, or improvement of facilities to meet the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b), and provide vehicular access roads to the harbor or facility, as recommended by the Department of Transportation pursuant to Division 13
 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, unless the reasons for not meeting those provisions and recommendations are set forth in the contract or agreement with the department, or an addendum thereto.

(2) The small craft harbor or boating facility shall be designed, constructed, developed, improved, and operated to meet, at a minimum, applicable certification standards described in the Tier 1 standards of the California Green Building Standards Code (Part 11 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(d) During the term of any existing or new loan contract made pursuant to Section 71.4 or 76.3, or any existing or new contract or agreement pursuant to Section 70, 70.2, or 70.8, the department shall supervise and monitor compliance with this section and the operation and maintenance of the harbor or facility to assure that the planning, construction,
 development, or improvement fully complies with this section and the contract or agreement terms and conditions.

(e) For the purposes of this chapter and Article 3 (commencing with Section 70) of Chapter 2, a harbor or facility that is the subject of a contract or agreement as described in subdivision (d), is under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 106.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

87.

The department shall give consideration for funding the planning, construction, development, or improvement of small craft harbors to projects which are financially feasible and which make existing small craft harbors, which are subject to the jurisdiction of the department, substantially meet the provisions of Section 86.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 775, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

88.

A small craft harbor or boating facility funded pursuant to Section 70, 70.2, 70.8, 71.4, 72.5, or 76.3 is not liable for any damages which occur on a vessel using those facilities or pursuant to operation of the vessel, other than on the facilities of the harbor or boating facility. This section does not provide immunity from liability for a small craft harbor or boating facility for its negligent acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 922, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.5. NAVIGABLE WATERS [90. - 153.]



CHAPTER 1. Scope of Division [90. - 90.]

90.

The provisions of this Division, in so far as they are not in conflict with the admiralty and maritime jursidiction and laws of the United States, apply to navigable waters of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definition and Description [100. - 107.]

100.

Navigable waters and all streams of sufficient capacity to transport the products of the country are public ways for the purposes of navigation and of such transportation. However, the floodwaters of any navigable river, stream, slough, or other watercourse while temporarily flowing above the normal high-water mark over public or private lands outside any established banks of such river, stream, slough, or other watercourse are not navigable waters and nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting trespass on any such lands. For the purposes of this section, “floodwaters” refers to that elevation of water which occurs at extraordinary times of flood and does not mean the water elevation of ordinary annual or recurring high waters resulting from normal runoff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

101.

The following streams and waters are declared navigable and are public ways:

Albion River, to a point three miles from its mouth.

Alviso Slough, sometimes called Steamboat Slough, lying between the bay of San Francisco and the place where it was crossed by the tracks of the Southern Pacific Railroad Company on June 10, 1913.

Big River, to a point three miles from its mouth.

Channel Street, in the city of San Francisco, from the bay to the northeasterly line of Seventh Street, the width thereof to be one hundred forty feet.

Clear Lake, in Lake County; but this declaration shall not interfere with any rights of owners and claimants to reclaim swamp or overflowed land around the margin of Clear Lake.

Corte Madera Creek, in Marin County, from its mouth to a point as far as tidewater flows.

Coyote River between the bay of San Francisco and the place where it was crossed by the tracks of the Southern Pacific Railroad Company on June 10, 1913.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

The following streams and waters are also navigable and are public ways:

Deer Creek, between its mouth and the house of Peter Lassen.

Devil’s Slough, lying within the corporate limits of the city of San Jose, or of the town of Sunnyvale in Santa Clara County, and extending to San Francisco Bay.

Diablo Creek, from its junction with the Neuces, to a point opposite the warehouse of Frank Such, in Contra Costa County.

Feather River, between its mouth and a point fifty feet below the first bridge crossing Feather River above the mouth of the Yuba River.

Galinas, or Guyanas Slough or creek, in Marin County, from its mouth to the line of the Sonoma and Marin Railroad as it existed on March 18, 1907.

Guadalupe Slough, which is the outlet or mouth of the Guadalupe River, and lies between San Francisco Bay and its junction with Alviso Slough.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

The following streams and waters are also navigable and are public ways:

Johnson’s Creek, from its mouth at San Francisco Bay to Simpson’s Landing.

Keys Creek, also known as the Arroyo de San Antonio, in Marin County, from its mouth at Tomales Bay to the warehouses on the point at Keys embarcadero.

Klamath River, from its mouth in Del Norte County to its confluence with the Shasta River in the county of Siskiyou; but this shall not abrogate or infringe upon mining rights or the rights of locating or operating mining claims on the Klamath River, existing on August 21, 1933, otherwise than by being made subject to the public rights of way herein declared.

Arroyo del Medo, in the county of Santa Clara, from its mouth to the upper line of the town of New Haven.

Mission Creek, in the county of San Francisco.

Mokelumne River, between its mouth and the first falls.

Moro Cojo Slough, in Monterey County, from Salinas River to tidewater.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

The following streams and waters are also navigable and are public ways:

Napa River, between its mouth and a point sixty feet below the westerly line of Lawrence Street in the city of Napa; First Napa Creek, Second Napa Creek, and Third Napa Creek, in Sonoma County, between Napa and Sonoma rivers.

Neuces Creek, from its mouth at Suisun Bay to a point one-half mile above the warehouse of George P. Loucks.

Newport Bay, in the county of Orange, and all its arms, and the sloughs connecting with the bay in which the tide ebbs and flows, including “The Rialto” and “The Rivo Alto” as shown upon a map of Canal Section, Newport Beach, recorded in Book 4, page 98 of Miscellaneous Maps, records of Orange County, California. 

Novato Creek, or estuary, in Marin County, from its mouth to Sweetzer’s Landing.

Noyo River, to a point three miles from its mouth.

Petaluma River, from its mouth to the southerly line of Washington Street, in the city of Petaluma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 613.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

The following streams and waters are also navigable and are public ways:

Sacramento River, between its mouth and a point 100 feet below Reid’s Ferry, in Shasta County.

Salinas River and Elkhorn Slough, or Estero Viejo, in Monterey County, from its mouth to a point as far up as tidewater flows.

San Joaquin River, between its mouth and Sycamore Point.

San Leandro Bay, in the County of Alameda, the waters included in the estuary of San Antonio and the tidal canal connecting it with San Leandro; and the airport channel extending from the bay.

San Rafael Creek, in Marin County, from its mouth to a point as far as tidewater flows therein.

Sonoma River, between its mouth and a point opposite Fowler’s hotel in the town of San Luis.

Stockton Slough, between its mouth and a line 160 feet west of the east line of Center Street extended in Stockton.

Suisun River, between its mouth and the Town of Suisun embarcadero.

Tuolumne River, between its mouth and Dickinson’s Ferry.

Yuba River, between its mouth and a point at the mouth of the slough at the foot of F Street, in the City of Marysville.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1952, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

106.

The following streams and waters are also navigable and are public ways:

The north branch of Alameda Creek, from its mouth to Eden Landing.

The streams and sloughs emptying into Eel River.

The streams and sloughs south of Eureka, in Humboldt County, which prior to January 2, 1873, were used for the purpose of floating logs or timber.

The sloughs south of Humboldt Point, in Humboldt County, which at high water mark have a depth of two feet of water, and which are wide enough to float and admit a boat carrying five tons or more of freight.

That part of a slough which lies between Simonds Canal in the town of Alviso and the bay of San Francisco.

That certain creek running through the tideland survey numbered 68, and swamp and overflowed land survey numbered 145, from its mouth to the head of the tidewater therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

107.

The coast line of the State of California from the boundary line between it and Mexico on the south, to the boundary line between it and Oregon on the north, is as defined and determined, on August 21, 1933, by the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey, and the names of the islands, rocks, headlands, bays, bodies of water and other geographic features are in accordance with nomenclature adopted by the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey as shown on its charts.

This section is not to be construed as defining or affecting property rights or property boundaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Offenses [130. - 135.]

130.

Every person who cuts or causes to be cut down any tree, so that it falls into any navigable waters, and who does not remove it within twenty-four hours after it falls into the water, is liable to a penalty of five dollars for each tree.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

131.

(a) A person who unlawfully obstructs the navigation of any navigable waters is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 16.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132.

Every person who, within the anchorage of any port, harbor, or cove of this State, into which vessels may enter for the purpose of receiving or discharging cargo, throws overboard from any vessel all or any part of the ballast, or who otherwise places or causes to be placed in such port, harbor, or cove, any obstructions to navigation, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

133.

(a) Except in case of emergency imperiling life or property, or unavoidable accident, collision, or stranding, or as otherwise permitted by law, it is unlawful and constitutes a misdemeanor for a person to discharge, or suffer the discharge of, oil by any methods, means, or manner, into or upon the navigable waters of the state from any vessel using oil as fuel for the generation of propulsion power, or any vessel carrying or having oil in excess of that necessary for its lubricating requirements, and as may be required under the laws and prescribed rules and regulations of the United States and this state.

(b) As used in this section, the term “oil” means oil of any kind or in any form, including fuel oil, oil sludge, and oil
 refuse, and the term, “navigable waters of the state,” means all portions of the sea within the territorial jurisdiction of the state, and all inland waters navigable in fact in which the tide ebbs and flows.

 (c) A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of this
 section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 17.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

134.
